orig/nonfiniteRulesErz.twol
! -*- encoding: utf-8-unix -*-
Alphabet
а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я  
А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О П Р С Т У Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я
!!2006-12-05 removed "м:0" type notations from alphabet because 
!it caused letters to disappear whenever they wanted to

! verbal stem vowels
!these are used with verbs like:
! "кадомс", "молемс" and  "пезэмс"
У1:0 !
И1:0 !
Ы1:0 !

! Nominal stem vowels that alternate 
! work with "+VLoss" and "+NoVLoss" tags
!
У2:
И2: 

!!!!!!
!!кедИ3
!!покшУ3
!!пикшЫ3
У3:0 !
И3:0 !
Ы3:0 !

!Suffix final variant vowel for hard vs soft
У4:0 !

! verbal stem consonant that appear in PretI 3sg
Т1:0 !

! derivational suffix protovowel with "o" and "a" 
!realisation  in deverbal noun ending
А1:а !

! conjugational suffix protovowels 
!showing "a" vs "я" and "ы" vs "и" alternation
А2:а !А2
Ы2:ы !

! derivational suffix protovowel  "mo" and "me"
О1:о !

! clitic proto consonant
Г1:0 !



! Prolative Ga
Г2: !


! Imperative clitic proto consonant
!Г4:г !
!Г4:к !
!Г4:0 !
!Replace these with "G1" but apply stem final "K4" to
!




! imperative suffix
К1:к !

!

! connegative suffix rendering vowel
К3:0 !

! Stem final on Imperative Verbs
!К4:0 !


! Some verbs need a marker for vowel placement
!Used before Conjuntive ending
V1: !
! I2 and U2 adjectives and nouns need this with their "t" and "s"
!V2:0 

VLoss:0
NoVLoss:0

%- !Hyphen with constructions like "-buti"
%^:0

;


Sets
vows = а о у ы э я ё ю и е ;
verbStemVows = а о э я ё е У1 И1 Ы1 ;
verbStemVowStrong = а о э я ё е ;
verbStemVowWeak = У1 И1 Ы1 ;
noGlideVow = а о у ы э ;
glideVow = я ё ю и е ;
subseqBack = а о у я ё ю ;
subseqFront = ы и е э ;

Cons = б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ;
ConsBack = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ;
ConsVoiced = б в г д ж з й л м н р ;
ConsVoicedDent = д з л н р ;
ConsVoicedNonDent = б в г ж й м ;
ConsVoiceless = к п с т ф х ц ч ш щ ;
ConsVoicelessDent = с т ц ;
ConsVoicelessNonDent = к п ф х ч ш щ ;
ConsNonDent = б в г ж к м п ф х ч ш щ ;
ConsDent = д з л н р с т ц  ;
ConsDentNoL = д з н р с т ц  ;

Letters = vows Cons ь ъ ;

Definitions
SubseqBackHarm =  [А2:а|а|А1:а|А1:о| О1:о| о |а:я|У2:о|V1:о| у| А2:я|я| ё| ю] ;
Back = .#. :* [SubseqBackHarm \[:subseqFront|:й|:ь|Ы3:|И3:|И2: ]* ( л ь ) [ConsBack]]  ;
![SubseqBackHarm [:ConsBack|:ConsBack :ConsBack|:ConsBack :ConsBack :ConsBack |:ConsBack :ConsBack :ConsBack :ConsBack |:ConsBack :ConsBack :ConsBack :ConsBack :ConsBack |:ConsBack :ConsBack :ConsBack :ConsBack :ConsBack :ConsBack |:ConsBack :ConsBack :ConsBack :ConsBack :ConsBack :ConsBack :ConsBack ]|SubseqBackHarm л ь [ConsBack]]  ;

FrontHard = .#. :* [[subseqFront|:й|ConsDentNoL :ь ] \[SubseqBackHarm|У3:|У2:|А1:]+|л ь Cons+|subseqFront л ь] ConsDent ;
!FrontHard = .#. :* [[subseqFront|й|ConsDentNoL ь ] ~SubseqBackHarm+|л ь Cons+|subseqFront л ь] ConsDent ;

FrontSoft = .#. :* [[subseqFront|й] \[SubseqBackHarm|У3:|У2:|А1:]+| ConsDentNoL ь ConsNonDent|subseqFront л ь ConsNonDent|й:] ;
!FrontSoft = .#. :* [[[subseqFront|й] [Cons |Cons Cons |Cons Cons Cons |Cons Cons Cons Cons |Cons Cons Cons Cons Cons |Cons Cons Cons Cons Cons Cons |Cons Cons Cons Cons Cons Cons Cons ]| [ConsDentNoL ь ConsNonDent|subseqFront л ь ConsNonDent] ~SubseqBackHarm+|й:]] ;

Front = [FrontHard | FrontSoft |.#. :*  [:subseqFront|:ь|:й И3:0 |:й И2:0]] ;
!Front = [FrontHard | FrontSoft |[:subseqFront|:ь] [:* - SubseqBackHarm*] ] ;

Front1 = .#. :* [[:subseqFront|И1:| Ы1:|й|:ь] [:* - SubseqBackHarm*] ] ;


Poss = (V1:) [м | н [У4:|ь:] | т [У4:|ь:]  | (н) з О1: | н О1: к | н к |с т [ %^:0 Г1:| #:]] ;


Rules

!Changes in the stem vowels before "10", "20", "30" and "60"
"verbStemVowStrong:0"
 X:Y <=> Cons _ (Т1:0) %^:0 [А2: [ н | т ]| Ы2:] ;
!                                               _ К4:0 %^:0  Ы2: ;
          where X in (а о э я ё е)
                Y in (0 0 0 0 0 0) matched ;



!Consonant Stem Verbs lose stem vowel
"verbStemVowWeakU1:0"
  У1:0 <=> ConsBack _ %^:0 [А2: [ н | т ]|т А2: [ д | н ]|К1:|Ы2:| с [(т) ь: |  [ы | а ] ]| V1:о] ;


!Consonant Stem Verbs lose stem vowel
"verbStemVowWeakI1:0"
  Ы1:0 <=> [ConsDent|vows] _ %^:0 [А2: [ н | т ]|т А2: [ д | н ]|К1:|Ы2:| с [(т) ь: |  [ы | а ] ]| V1:] ;


!Consonant Stem Verbs with Palatalized Dental lose stem vowel
"YI1:0"
       И1:0 <=> [Cons|vows|й:] _ %^:0 [А2: [ н | т ]| Ы2: | V1:е | м О1: %^:0 к с ];
      .#. :* [Cons - л]  _ %^:0 [т А2: [ д | н ]| К1:] ;
      .#. :* [Cons - л|vows]   _ %^:0 с (т) ь: ;
       [ConsNonDent|й:|vows] _ %^:0 с [ы |а ] ;
                й:0 _ %^:0 [Ы2:|V1:е] ;

"YI1:y"
И1:ь <=>  ConsDent  _ %^:0  с [ы | а ] ;
      .#.   :* л  _ %^:0 [т А2:я [ д | н ]| К1: |с (т) ь:] ;


"U1:o, YI1:ye"
[У1:о| И1:е] <=> [Cons|vows] _ %^:0 К3:0 ;

"I1:e"
Ы1:э <=> ConsDent _ %^:0 К3:0 ;

!Vowels in Nouns and Adjectives 
!2006-12-02
"YI3:y"
И3:ь <=>  ConsDent  _ [%^:0  [с | c (t) О1:э |:ConsNonDent]| #:] ;
      .#.   :* л  _ [%^:0 :Cons|#:] ;




!Changes in stem Consonants

"A1:o"
А1:о <=>  [ а |я ] %^:0  м  _ ;

"Y2:yi"
Ы2:и <=> [ я:0 (К4:0)| ё:0 | е:0 (Т1:0) | И1:0 |ConsNonDent [noGlideVow:0|У1:0]] :0*  %^:0 _ ;

!2009-10-14 from nounRulesMyv.twol
!
"O1:o"
О1:о <=> [[Back|У3:] %^:0 | [в|в:0] т О1:о| У2:0 %^:0 V1:о в т О1:о ] м  _  [ #: |%^:0 [Г1:0 | Poss |н т ]] ;
         [[Back|subseqBack| У3:] %^:0|%^:0 V1:о] з _ %^:0  [м | н У4:0 | т У4:0  | н з О1:о | н О1:о к | н к | с т] [ %^:0 [Г1:0|Г1:г|Г1:к] а:| #:] ;

          [.#. [:* Back] - [:* [vows|й]] %^:0 (V1:о)|subseqBack %^:0 | У3:0 %^:0 V1:о (%^:0) | О1:о  %^:0 ]  н _ к ;
         [[:subseqBack| У3:] %^:0 | У2:0 %^:0 VLoss:0 |%^:0 V1:о] д:  _ [%^:0 [Г1:0|  Poss |н т ]| #: ] ;
         [[subseqBack| У3:] %^:0 |У2:0 %^:0 V1:о] в: т _ м [О1:0|О1:о] ;
         [[У3:|SubseqBackHarm] %^:0|V1:о |У2: %^:0 VLoss:0] с (т) _  [ #: |%^:0 [Г1:0 | Poss |т | н| с |Г2: |д: |л ]] ;
         [[SubseqBackHarm] %^:0|%^:0 V1:о] (н) з _ [ #: |%^:0 [Г1:0|л| т | н| с |Г2: |д: ] ] ;
         [%^:0 V1:о|:subseqBack (Т1:0) %^:0] м (с т | с | д )  _  [ #: |%^:0 [д: | Г1: | Poss ]] ;


"O1:0"
О1:0 <=>   _  %^:0 А2: ;


"O1:ye"
О1:е <=> Front в: _ л ;
         [FrontSoft|FrontHard|И3:] %^:0 в: т [ :е| :э] м  _  [ #: |%^:0 [Г1: | Poss | к с ]] ;
         [:subseqFront] (%^:0) н _ к ;
!Adding "О1:е" option to environment 19.04.2007
         [:subseqFront| И3: | О1:е ] %^:0 (м) д:  _ [%^:0 [Г1:| н  |Poss ]| #: ] ;
         [:subseqFront| И3:] %^:0 в: т _ м О1: ;
          [V1:е|V1:э|:subseqFront (Т1:0) %^:0] м (д ) _  [ #: |%^:0 [д: | Г1: | Poss ]] ;


"O1:e"
О1:э <=>
         ConsDent Ы3:0  %^:0 д:  _ [%^:0 [Г1: |  Poss] | #: ] ;
         [[[И3:|:subseqFront] %^:0 |V1:е |V1:э] (м)|И2: %^:0 VLoss:0] с (т) _  [ #: |%^:0 [Г1: | Poss |т | н| с |Г2: |д: |л ]] ;
         [[Front| :subseqFront] %^:0|%^:0 [V1:е| V1:э]] з _ %^:0 Poss ;
         [[:subseqFront| \[А1:|О1:о|SubseqBackHarm]] %^:0|%^:0 [V1:е| V1:э]] (н) з _ [ #: |%^:0 Г1: ] ;
         ConsDent Ы3:0  %^:0 в:0 т _ м О1: ;
         [V1:е|V1:э|:subseqFront (Т1:0) %^:0] м с (т ) _  [ #: |%^:0 [д: | Г1: | Poss ]] ;


!Changes in the suffix vowels
"A2:ya"
А2:я <=>
         [[subseqFront|й|ь][ConsDent - л]|И2:0|И3:|[ConsDent - л] [И1:0| И2:0|ь:0]|л И1:ь | :subseqFront  | й (И1:0|И2:0)] %^:0 т _  [ д | н ] ;
 [ConsDent [И2:0|И3:]|ConsDent [И1:0  |ь:0 |я:0 | ё:0 | е:0 ]|я:0 | ё:0 | е:0 ]  %^:0  _ [ т | н ] ;
         :vows [Ы1:0|(й:) [И1:0|И2:0] |й:]  %^:0  _ [ т | н ] ;


"j:0"
й:0 <=> :vows _ [И1:е |И2:е  |И1:0  %^:0 [Ы2:и|V1:е К3:]|(И1:0|И2:0|И3:0)  %^:0 [А2: |V1: :Cons] ] ;



"ye:e"
е:э <=>
          ConsDent (У3:0|Ы3:0) %^:0  н _ [[ #:|%^:0 Г1:]|н ь: ] ;
          [Back - [:* vows]| У3:0|ConsDent Ы3:0]  %^:0 т н _ [ #:|%^:0 [Г1:|т| л|Г2: а |в|д|к|н|с|ш]];


"a:ya"
а:я  <=> :vows (Т1:0|Т1:0 %^:0 К3:0|%^:0 К3:0) %^:0 Г1:0 _  ;


!Changes in suffix consonants
"v:0"
в:0 <=> Cons %^:0 _ т О1: м О1: ;



"G1:g"
Г1:г  <=> [ConsVoicedDent (:ь|У4:0|У3:0|И3:0|Ы3:0)|й И3:0 |[ConsVoicedNonDent - г] (:ь|У3:0|И3:0|Ы3:0)] %^:0 _ а ;


"G1:k sometimes"
Г1:к  <=  [ConsVoicelessDent (:ь|И3:0|У3:0|Ы3:0)|[ConsVoicelessNonDent - к ]| г |К4:0] %^:0 _ а  ;

"G1:k always"
Г1:к  =>  [ConsVoicelessDent (:ь|И3:0|У3:0|Ы3:0)|ConsVoicelessNonDent  | г |К4:0] :0* %^:0 _ а  ;


!Prolative
"G2:g"
Г2:г  <=> [ConsVoicedDent (:ь|И3:0|У3:0|Ы3:0)|ConsVoicedNonDent - г] %^:0 _ а ;

"G2:v"! 
Г2:в  <=> :vows (:0) %^:0 _ а [ #: |%^:0 [Г1: | Poss |т | н| с |д: |в: |к с| л ] ];


"G2:k"
Г2:к  <=>  [ ConsVoicelessDent (:ь|И3:0|У3:0|Ы3:0)|ConsVoicelessNonDent (И3:0|У3:0|Ы3:0)| г (И3:0|У3:0)] %^:0 _ а [ #: |%^:0 [Г1: | Poss |т | н| с |д: |в: |к с| л ] ] ;

!!Depricated
!!"G3:g" !Imperative Clitics
!!Г4:г  <=> з ь %^:0 _ а ;
!!
!!!
!!"G4:0"
!!Г4:0  <=>
!!           К1: %^:0 _ а ;
!!  [О1:е|О1:о] %^:0 _ а: ;
!
!
!!"G3:k"
!!Г4:к  <=>  #: [и л я|у ж о|а з ё|а д я|а й д а] %^:0 _ а  ;


"m:0" 
м:0 <=> 
 subseqBack  _ У2:  %^:0 VLoss: т ;
        т (ь) _ [У2:|И2:]  %^:0  VLoss: [с (т) О1:|с [#:| %^:0 Г1:]] ;



! imperative suffix
"K1:t"
К1:т <=>  [ И1:0 |И1:ь| У1:0 | Ы1:0 ] %^:0 _  ;



! Suffix final hard vs soft
"U4:y"
У4:ь  <=  [ И1:0 | Ы1:0 | :subseqFront ] %^:0 (V1:) [ :т|н]  _  [#: |%^:0 Г1: ] ;


!Ablative d/t
"d:t"
д:т  <=> [ ConsVoiceless | д | г] [ь:0|И3:0|Ы3:0|У3:0]  %^:0 _ О1: ;

!Word final Vowels


"y:0"
ь:0 <=>        ConsDent  _  %^:0 V1:е :Cons ;
              ConsDentNoL _ %^:0 [в: т О1: м О1: | н|д:|т|А2:|с (т) [ь:|е:]] ;

"V1:ye"
V1:е <=> ConsDent: ь:0 %^:0 _ :Cons ;
         [FrontSoft Fronthard]  %^:0 _ :Cons;
       [[Cons|й:|vows]  И1:0|[Cons|й:] И2:0|И3:0] %^:0  _ ;


"V1:e"
V1:э <=> FrontHard %^:0 _ :Cons ;
         ConsDent [Ы1:0|Ы3:0] %^:0  _ ;


"V1:o"
V1:о <=> .#. [:* Back] - [:* [vows|й]] %^:0 _ :Cons ;
         Cons [У1:0|У2:0|У3:0] %^:0  _ ;



"U2:0"
У2:0 <=>  _ %^:0 VLoss:0 [т У4: |т н е: |с (т) О1:| с [ %^:0 |  #: ] ] ;
         _ %^:0 V1: ;

"U2:o"
У2:о  <=>  _ [%^:0 NoVLoss:0 [т У4:|т н е: |с ь:|с (т) О1:| с [ %^:0 |  #: ]| л  ]| [(н) з О1:|ш к а|к с | н|в|Г2:|д | с т [ %^:0 |  #: ] | Г1:]|  #:] ;


"YI2:0"
И2:0 <=> _ %^:0 VLoss:0 [т У4: |т н е:] ;
         ConsNonDent: _ %^:0 VLoss:0 [с (т) О1:| с [ %^:0 |  #: ] ] ;
         _ %^:0 V1:е ;

"YI2:y"
И2:ь  <=>  ConsDent _ %^:0 VLoss:0 [с (т) О1:| с [ %^:0 |  #: ] ] ;


"YI2:ye"
И2:е  <=>   _ [%^:0 NoVLoss:0 [т У4:|т н е|с ь:|с (т) О1: |с (т) ь:| с [ %^:0 |  #: ] | л ]| [(н) з О1:|ш к а|к с | н|в|д | с т [ %^:0 |  #: ] | Г1:]|  #:] ;
